Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.470

Underground electric and communication facilities, installation or conversion to—Utility conversion guaranty fund—Operation.

Whenever there shall be paid out of the guaranty fund any sum on account of principal or interest of a county road improvement district bond or warrant, the county, as trustee for the fund, shall be subrogated to all the rights of the owner of the bond or any interest coupon or warrant so paid, and the proceeds thereof, or of the assessment underlying the same, shall become part of the guaranty fund. There shall also be paid into each guaranty fund the interest received from investments of the fund, as well as any surplus remaining in any county road improvement fund guaranteed hereunder after the payment of all outstanding bonds or warrants payable primarily out of such utility conversion county road improvement district fund. Warrants drawing interest at a rate or rates not to exceed the rate determined by the county legislative authority shall be issued, as other warrants are issued by the county, against the guaranty fund to meet any liability accruing against it, and at the time of making its annual budget and tax levy the county shall provide from funds available for the deposit in the guaranty fund of a sum sufficient with other resources of such fund to pay warrants so issued during the preceding fiscal year. As among the several issues of bonds or warrants guaranteed by the fund no preference shall exist, but defaulted bonds, interest payments, and warrants shall be purchased out of the fund in the order of their presentation.

Every county establishing a guaranty fund for utility conversion road improvement district bonds or warrants shall prescribe by resolution appropriate rules and regulations for the maintenance and operation of such guaranty fund not inconsistent herewith. So much of the money of a guaranty fund as is necessary may be used to purchase underlying bonds or warrants guaranteed by the fund, or to purchase certificates of delinquency for general taxes on property subject to local improvement assessments, or to purchase such property at tax foreclosures, for the purpose of protecting the guaranty fund. The fund shall be subrogated to the rights of the county and the county, acting on behalf of the fund, may foreclose the lien of general tax certificates of delinquency and purchase the property at the foreclosure sale for the account of said fund. Whenever the legislative authority of any county shall so cause a lien of general tax certificates of delinquency to be foreclosed and the property to be so purchased at a foreclosure sale, the court costs and costs of publication and expenses for clerical work and/or other expense incidental thereto, shall be chargeable to and payable from the guaranty fund. After so acquiring title to real property, a county may lease or sell and convey the same at public or private sale for such price and on such terms as may be determined by resolution of the county legislative authority, and all proceeds resulting from such sales shall belong to and be paid into the guaranty fund.

[ 1983 c 167 s 98; 1981 c 156 s 13; 1967 c 194 s 7.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.